Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3215
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Special Deposits Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 15.